nb: Papirtype for utklippsbok: Kartong; Mønstret; Spesialitet; Annet
pl: Typ papieru do scrapbookingu: Brystol; Wzorzyste; Specjalizacja; Inne
fi: Leikekirjan paperityyppi: Kartonki; Kuviollinen; Erityinen; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta papira za spomenar: Tvrdi papir; S uzorkom; Specijalizirano; Ostalo
th: ประเภทกระดาษสมุดบันทึกทำมือ: กระดาษการ์ด; มีลวดลาย; เฉพาะทาง; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip hârtie pentru album de însemnări: Carton; Modelat; Specialitate; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta papirja za scrapbook: Šeleshamer; Vzorčasta; Posebnost; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de papel de álbum de recortes: Cartão; Estampado; Especialidade; Outro
es: Tipo de papel para álbumes de recortes: Cartulina; Estampados; Especialidad; Otros
lt-LT: Iškarpų albumo popieriaus tipas: Kartonas; Raštuotas; Specializuotas; Kita
en: Scrapbook paper type: Cardstock; Patterned; Specialty; Other
ko: 스크랩북 용지 종류: 마분지; 패턴이 있는; 특수; 기타
zh-TW: 剪貼簿紙張類型: 卡片紙; 圖案; 專業; 其他
zh-CN: 剪贴簿纸张类型: 卡片纸; 带图案; 特种; 其他
sv: Scrapbook-papperstyp: Papp; Mönstrad; Specialitet; Övrigt
de: Papiertyp des Scrapbooks: Kartonpapier; Gemustert; Speziell; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di carta dell’album di ritagli: Cartoncino; A fantasia; Specialità; Altro
el: Τύπος χαρτιού λευκώματος: Χαρτόνι; Με μοτίβα; Ειδικό; Άλλο
nl: Type plakboekpapier: Karton; Met patroon; Specialiteit; Andere
ru: Тип бумаги для скрапбукинга: Картон; С узорами; Специальная; Другое
fr: Type de papier pour scrapbooking: Carton; A motifs; Spécialité; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de papel de álbum de recortes: Cartolina; Com padrão; Halter especial; Outro
da: Scrapbogspapirtype: Karton; Mønstret; Specialitet; Andet
vi: Loại giấy sổ lưu niệm: Giấy bìa; Có hoa văn; Chuyên dụng; Khác
sk-SK: Typ papiera na zápisník: Kartónový obal; Vzorovaný; Špecialita; Iné
cs: Typ papíru pro scrapbook: Papíry a čtvrtky; Vzorované; Speciální; Jiné
ja: スクラップブックの紙の種類: カラーペーパー; 模様入り; 特化; その他
hu: Album papírlapjának típusa: Kartonpapír; Mintás; Speciális; Egyéb
tr: Karalama defteri kağıt türü: Kalın Kağıt; Desenli; Özel; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип хартия за скрапбук: Картон; На фигури; Специална; Други